Utah statutes.
20A-2-307.   County clerks' instructions to election judges.

(1)  Each county clerk shall instruct election judges to allow a voter to vote a regular ballot if:

(a)  the voter has moved from one address within a voting precinct to another address within the same voting precinct; and

(b)  the voter affirms the change of address orally or in writing before the election judges.

(2)  Each county clerk shall instruct election judges to allow a person to vote a provisional ballot if:

(a)  the voter's name does not appear on the official register; or

(b)  the voter is challenged as provided in Section 20A-3-202.

